hw7/Psittacine.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+GER
+ADJ
+INESS2
+ADESS2
+INESS3
+ADESS3
+POSS
+PST
+HST
+FUT
+NEG
+AGT.ANIM
+AGT.INANIM
+PTCP
+NMLZ

LEXICON Root
ConjRoot;
NounRoot;
VerbRoot;   
AdjRoot;   

LEXICON ConjRoot
and:tot         #;
or:cec          #;

LEXICON NounRoot
bird:wihǔ       Noun;
forest:hengó    Noun;
heart:kîr       Noun;
metal:twazwa    Material;
water:kwal      Material;
! Pronouns can be accounted for as nouns.
1.SG:wùg        Stance;
1.PL:wùgwùg     Stance;
DEM.DIST.INANIM.SG:krũx     Material;
DEM.DIST.INANIM.PL:krũxkrũx Stance;

LEXICON Material
+ADJ:hły        Adj;
0:0             Noun;

LEXICON Noun
0:0             Stance;
+like:łon       Adj;

LEXICON Stance
+INESS2:ni      Stance;
+ADESS2:na      Stance;
+INESS3:li      Stance;
+ADESS3:la      Stance;
+POSS:ty        Stance;
0:0             #;

LEXICON VerbRoot
do:zà           Verb;
eat:kōg         Verb;
make:hłĩk       Verb;
see:krân        Verb;
use:õg          Verb;

LEXICON AdjRoot
big:xrôk        Adj;
bright:nùr      Adj;
good:kwãl       Adj;
red:cycīl       Adj;

LEXICON Adj
0:0             Verb;
+become:kac     Verb;

LEXICON Verb
+AGT.ANIM:ryl   Noun;
+AGT.INANIM:łyr Noun;
+NMLZ:zoc       Noun;
+PTCP:et        Adj;
+GER:ga         Noun;
0:0             Tense;

LEXICON Tense
0:0             Negation;
+PST:ce         Negation;
+HST:cat        Negation;
+FUT:wyk        Negation;

LEXICON Negation
0:0             #;
+NEG:hy         #;
